Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201984-1331
Act, how cited.

Sections 84-1301 to 84-1331 shall be known and may be cited as the State Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 31, p. 1677;

Laws 1984, LB 751, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 73;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 53;

Laws 1995, LB 501, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 50;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 43;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 45;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 42;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 77;

Laws 1999, LB 687, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 62;

Laws 2002, LB 687, § 32;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB34, § 27.